Florida, session 2026, SB762.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 24 25 Section 1.âPresent subsections (6) through (10) of section 26 27.511, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as subsections (7) 27 through (11), respectively, and a new subsection (6) is added to 28 that section, to read: 29 27.511âOffices of criminal conflict and civil regional 30 counsel; legislative intent; qualifications; appointment; 31 duties.â 32 (6)(a)âAt any time that an office of criminal conflict and 33 civil regional counsel determines that it can no longer 34 represent an indigent defendant in a death penalty case due to a 35 conflict of interest or a lack of qualifications, it must 36 provide written notice to the court. The written notice must 37 state that the person has been determined to be indigent under 38 s. 27.52, that the state has filed a notice of intent to seek 39 the death penalty, and that it can no longer provide 40 representation due to a conflict of interest or a lack of 41 qualifications. Upon receiving the notice, the court is 42 authorized to appoint an office of criminal conflict and civil 43 regional counsel from another region to represent the defendant 44 provided that their designated counsel is qualified to provide 45 competent representation in death penalty cases. These 46 provisions are effective notwithstanding ss. 27.40 and 27.5305, 47 which authorize the appointment of a private attorney to 48 represent the defendant. When evaluating a case for referral and 49 appointment to an office of criminal conflict and civil regional 50 counsel under this section, the court shall consider judicial 51 economy and geographic proximity. 52 (b)âSubject to legislative appropriation, the office of 53 criminal conflict and civil regional counsel appointed from 54 another region under paragraph (a) shall provide documentation 55 for all due process costs and services of representation to the 56 Justice Administrative Commission for reimbursement. 57 (c)âBiannually, by February 1 and August 1, each regional 58 office of the office of criminal conflict and civil regional 59 counsel which accepts an appointment under paragraph (a) in a 60 case involving a person determined to be indigent under s. 27.52 61 in which the state has filed a notice of intent to seek the 62 death penalty shall submit a report to the commission. For each 63 case, the report must contain all of the following information: 64 1.âThe office of criminal conflict and civil regional 65 counsel appointed and the date of appointment, including the 66 name of counsel assigned. 67 2.âThe length of time the capital case has been pending. 68 3.âThe date the state filed a notice of intent to seek the 69 death penalty. 70 4.âThe number of victims. 71 5.âThe status of any ongoing discovery, including any 72 discovery deadline set by the court. 73 6.âThe number of outstanding motions. 74 7.âWhether there is a mitigation specialist, and, if so, 75 the date of his or her employment, as well as any mitigation 76 work product. 77 (d)âIf the office of criminal conflict and civil regional 78 counsel from another region cannot accept an appointment under 79 paragraph (a) because of a conflict of interest or a lack of 80 qualified attorneys, private counsel must be appointed. 81 Section 2.âParagraph (a) of subsection (2) of section 82 744.331, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 83 744.331âProcedures to determine incapacity.â 84 (2)âATTORNEY FOR THE ALLEGED INCAPACITATED PERSON.â 85 (a)âWhen a court appoints an attorney for an alleged 86 incapacitated person, the court must appoint the office of 87 criminal conflict and civil regional counsel or a private 88 attorney as prescribed in s. 27.511(7) s. 27.511(6). A private 89 attorney must be one who is included in the attorney registry 90 compiled pursuant to s. 27.40. Appointments of private attorneys 91 must be made on a rotating basis, taking into consideration 92 conflicts arising under this chapter. 93 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.